Hawaii statutes.
[§328-12.3] Protection of food. All
food shall be prepared, stored, displayed, dispensed, placed, sold, and served
so as to be protected from dust, insects, rodents, unnecessary handling,
droplet infection, overhead leakage, or other contamination. [L 1983, c 150, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next